Illinois, session 104th, SB3862.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Sections 33G-3 and 33G-9 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/33G-3)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on July 1, 2027)8    Sec. 33G-3. Definitions. As used in this Article:9    (a) "Another state" means any State of the United States 10(other than the State of Illinois), or the District of 11Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any territory 12or possession of the United States, or any political 13subdivision, or any department, agency, or instrumentality 14thereof.15    (b) "Enterprise" includes:16        (1) any partnership, corporation, association, 17    business or charitable trust, or other legal entity; and18        (2) any group of individuals or other legal entities, 19    or any combination thereof, associated in fact although 20    not itself a legal entity. An association in fact must be 21    held together by a common purpose of engaging in a course 22    of conduct, and it may be associated together for purposes 23    that are both legal and illegal. An association in fact   SB3862- 2 -LRB104 18880 RLC 32325 b1    must:2            (A) have an ongoing organization or structure, 3        either formal or informal;4            (B) the various members of the group must function 5        as a continuing unit, even if the group changes 6        membership by gaining or losing members over time; and7            (C) have an ascertainable structure distinct from 8        that inherent in the conduct of a pattern of predicate 9        activity.10    As used in this Article, "enterprise" includes licit and 11illicit enterprises. 12    (c) "Labor organization" includes any organization, labor 13union, craft union, or any voluntary unincorporated 14association designed to further the cause of the rights of 15union labor that is constituted for the purpose, in whole or in 16part, of collective bargaining or of dealing with employers 17concerning grievances, terms or conditions of employment, or 18apprenticeships or applications for apprenticeships, or of 19other mutual aid or protection in connection with employment, 20including apprenticeships or applications for apprenticeships. 21    (d) "Operation or management" means directing or carrying 22out the enterprise's affairs and is limited to any person who 23knowingly serves as a leader, organizer, operator, manager, 24director, supervisor, financier, advisor, recruiter, supplier, 25or enforcer of an enterprise in violation of this Article. 26    (e) "Predicate activity" means any act that is a Class 2   SB3862- 3 -LRB104 18880 RLC 32325 b1felony or higher and constitutes a violation or violations of 2any of the following provisions of the laws of the State of 3Illinois (as amended or revised as of the date the activity 4occurred or, in the instance of a continuing offense, the date 5that charges under this Article are filed in a particular 6matter in the State of Illinois) or any act under the law of 7another jurisdiction for an offense that could be charged as a 8Class 2 felony or higher in this State:9        (1) under the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 10    Code of 2012: 8-1.2 (solicitation of murder for hire), 9-1 11    (first degree murder), 9-3.3 (drug-induced homicide), 10-1 12    (kidnapping), 10-2 (aggravated kidnapping), 10-3.1 13    (aggravated unlawful restraint), 10-4 (forcible 14    detention), 10-5(b)(10) (child abduction), 10-9 15    (trafficking in persons, involuntary servitude, and 16    related offenses), 11-1.20 (criminal sexual assault), 17    11-1.30 (aggravated criminal sexual assault), 11-1.40 18    (predatory criminal sexual assault of a child), 11-1.60 19    (aggravated criminal sexual abuse), 11-6 (indecent 20    solicitation of a child), 11-6.5 (indecent solicitation of 21    an adult), 11-14.3(a)(2)(A) and (a)(2)(B) (promoting 22    prostitution), 11-14.4 (promoting commercial sexual 23    exploitation of a child), 11-18.1 (patronizing a sexually 24    exploited child; patronizing a sexually exploited child), 25    12-3.05 (aggravated battery), 12-6.4 (criminal street gang 26    recruitment), 12-6.5 (compelling organization membership   SB3862- 4 -LRB104 18880 RLC 32325 b1    of persons), 12-7.3 (stalking), 12-7.4 (aggravated 2    stalking), 12-7.5 (cyberstalking), 12-11 or 19-6 (home 3    invasion), 12-11.1 or 18-6 (vehicular invasion), 18-1 4    (robbery; aggravated robbery), 18-2 (armed robbery), 18-3 5    (vehicular hijacking), 18-4 (aggravated vehicular 6    hijacking), 18-5 (aggravated robbery), 19-1 (burglary), 7    19-3 (residential burglary), 20-1 (arson; residential 8    arson; place of worship arson), 20-1.1 (aggravated arson), 9    20-1.2 (residential arson), 20-1.3 (place of worship 10    arson), 24-1.2 (aggravated discharge of a firearm), 11    24-1.2-5 (aggravated discharge of a machine gun or 12    silencer equipped firearm), 24-1.8 (unlawful possession of 13    a firearm by a street gang member), 24-3.2 (unlawful 14    discharge of firearm projectiles), 24-3.9 (aggravated 15    possession of a stolen firearm), 24-3A (gunrunning), 26-5 16    or 48-1 (dog-fighting), 29D-14.9 (terrorism), 29D-15 17    (soliciting support for terrorism), 29D-15.1 (causing a 18    catastrophe), 29D-15.2 (possession of a deadly substance), 19    29D-20 (making a terrorist threat), 29D-25 (falsely making 20    a terrorist threat), 29D-29.9 (material support for 21    terrorism), 29D-35 (hindering prosecution of terrorism), 22    31A-1.2 (unauthorized contraband in a penal institution), 23    33-1 (bribery), 33-3 (official misconduct), 33-3.1 24    (solicitation misconduct (State government)), 33-3.2 25    (solicitation misconduct (local government)), 33-8 26    (legislative misconduct), or 33A-3 (armed violence);  SB3862- 5 -LRB104 18880 RLC 32325 b1        (2) under the Cannabis Control Act: Sections 5 2    (manufacture or delivery of cannabis), 5.1 (cannabis 3    trafficking), or 8 (production or possession of cannabis 4    plants), provided the offense either involves more than 5    500 grams of any substance containing cannabis or involves 6    more than 50 cannabis sativa plants;7        (3) under the Illinois Controlled Substances Act: 8    Sections 401 (manufacture or delivery of a controlled 9    substance), 401.1 (controlled substance trafficking), 405 10    (calculated criminal drug conspiracy), or 405.2 (street 11    gang criminal drug conspiracy); or12        (4) under the Methamphetamine Control and Community 13    Protection Act: Sections 15 (methamphetamine 14    manufacturing), or 55 (methamphetamine delivery).15    (f) "Pattern of predicate activity" means:16        (1) at least 3 occurrences of predicate activity that 17    are in some way related to each other and that have 18    continuity between them, and that are separate acts. Acts 19    are related to each other if they are not isolated events, 20    including if they have similar purposes, or results, or 21    participants, or victims, or are committed a similar way, 22    or have other similar distinguishing characteristics, or 23    are part of the affairs of the same enterprise. There is 24    continuity between acts if they are ongoing over a 25    substantial period, or if they are part of the regular way 26    some entity does business or conducts its affairs; and  SB3862- 6 -LRB104 18880 RLC 32325 b1        (2) which occurs after the effective date of this 2    Article, and the last of which falls within 3 years 3    (excluding any period of imprisonment) after the first 4    occurrence of predicate activity.5    (g) "Unlawful death" includes the following offenses: 6under the Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012: Sections 79-1 (first degree murder) or 9-2 (second degree murder). 8(Source: P.A. 103-1071, eff. 7-1-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 9104-434, eff. 11-21-25.) 10    (720 ILCS 5/33G-9)11    (Section scheduled to be repealed on July 1, 2027)12    Sec. 33G-9. Repeal. This Article is repealed on January 1, 132035 July 1, 2027.14(Source: P.A. 103-4, eff. 5-31-23; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 15104-434, eff. 11-21-25.) 16    Section 10. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 17amended by changing Section 108B-3 as follows: 18    (725 ILCS 5/108B-3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 108B-3)19    Sec. 108B-3. Authorization for the interception of private 20communication.21    (a) The State's Attorney, or a person designated in 22writing or by law to act for him and to perform his duties 23during his absence or disability, may authorize, in writing,   SB3862- 7 -LRB104 18880 RLC 32325 b1an ex parte application to the chief judge of a court of 2competent jurisdiction for an order authorizing the 3interception of a private communication when no party has 4consented to the interception and (i) the interception may 5provide evidence of, or may assist in the apprehension of a 6person who has committed, is committing or is about to commit, 7a violation of Section 8-1(b) (solicitation of murder), 8-1.2 8(solicitation of murder for hire), 9-1 (first degree murder), 910-9 (involuntary servitude, involuntary sexual servitude of a 10minor, or trafficking in persons), paragraph (1), (2), or (3) 11of subsection (a) of Section 11-14.4 (promoting commercial 12sexual exploitation of a child), subdivision (a)(2)(A) or 13(a)(2)(B) of Section 11-14.3 (promoting prostitution), 11-15.1 14(soliciting for a sexually exploited child), 11-16 15(pandering), 11-17.1 (keeping a place of commercial sexual 16exploitation of a child), 11-18.1 (patronizing a sexually 17exploited child), 11-19.1 (juvenile pimping and aggravated 18juvenile pimping), or 29B-1 (money laundering) of the Criminal 19Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, Section 401, 401.1 20(controlled substance trafficking), 405, 405.1 (criminal drug 21conspiracy) or 407 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act 22or any Section of the Methamphetamine Control and Community 23Protection Act, a violation of Section 24-2.1, 24-2.2, 24-3, 2424-3.1, 24-3.3, 24-3.4, 24-4, or 24-5 or subsection 2524-1(a)(4), 24-1(a)(6), 24-1(a)(7), 24-1(a)(9), 24-1(a)(10), 26or 24-1(c) of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of   SB3862- 8 -LRB104 18880 RLC 32325 b12012, or an offense listed as predicate activity under 2subsection (e) of Section 33G-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or 3the Criminal Code of 2012, or conspiracy to commit money 4laundering or conspiracy to commit first degree murder; (ii) 5in response to a clear and present danger of imminent death or 6great bodily harm to persons resulting from: (1) a kidnapping 7or the holding of a hostage by force or the threat of the 8imminent use of force; or (2) the occupation by force or the 9threat of the imminent use of force of any premises, place, 10vehicle, vessel or aircraft; (iii) to aid an investigation or 11prosecution of a civil action brought under the Illinois 12Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus Prevention Act when there is 13probable cause to believe the interception of the private 14communication will provide evidence that a streetgang is 15committing, has committed, or will commit a second or 16subsequent gang-related offense or that the interception of 17the private communication will aid in the collection of a 18judgment entered under that Act; or (iv) upon information and 19belief that a streetgang has committed, is committing, or is 20about to commit a felony.21    (b) The State's Attorney or a person designated in writing 22or by law to act for the State's Attorney and to perform his or 23her duties during his or her absence or disability, may 24authorize, in writing, an ex parte application to the chief 25judge of a circuit court for an order authorizing the 26interception of a private communication when no party has   SB3862- 9 -LRB104 18880 RLC 32325 b1consented to the interception and the interception may provide 2evidence of, or may assist in the apprehension of a person who 3has committed, is committing or is about to commit, a 4violation of an offense under Article 29D of the Criminal Code 5of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.6    (b-1) Subsection (b) is inoperative on and after January 71, 2005.8    (b-2) No conversations recorded or monitored pursuant to 9subsection (b) shall be made inadmissible in a court of law by 10virtue of subsection (b-1).11    (c) As used in this Section, "streetgang" and 12"gang-related" have the meanings ascribed to them in Section 1310 of the Illinois Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus Prevention 14Act.15(Source: P.A. 103-1071, eff. 7-1-25.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.